Hawaii statutes.
§481G-6 Exceptions. No action may be
brought under section 481G-4 in connection with the termination, cancellation,
or nonrenewal of a dealership if the dealership provides for the binding
arbitration of disputes arising thereunder, including disputes related to the
termination, cancellation, or nonrenewal of the dealership, in accordance with
chapter 658A or the rules of the American Arbitration Association. [L 1983, c
285, pt of §1; am L 2008, c 19, §21]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next